Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB142.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Broadcast Freemarket Agreement Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Broadcast employee." An individual who provides services under an agreement with an employer."Covenant not to compete." An agreement between an employer and a broadcast employee that is designed to impede the ability of the broadcast employee to compete with the employer when a separating event occurs."Employer." A person that engages in the transmission of 123456789101112131415161718 radio or television programming and employs individuals under an agreement to perform service relating to the transmission. The term includes a television station or network, radio station, cable station or network, Internet or satellite-based service, new media, interactive media or any method that transmits or otherwise offers news, weather, traffic, sports or entertainment reports or programming."Separating event." A broadcast employee's voluntary or involuntary discontinuance of employment with an employer.Section 3. Prohibition.A covenant not to compete is deemed contrary to public policy and is void and unenforceable to the extent the covenant not to compete restricts:(1) Movement of a broadcast employee to a new employer.(2) A broadcast employee from performing services to an employer within a geographic area.Section 4. Nonwaiver.A purported waiver of the prohibition in section 3 of this act shall be void and unenforceable.Section 5. Construction.Nothing in this act shall be construed to:(1) Limit the period of time for which a party may agree to maintain information as confidential or as a trade secret.(2) Limit the geographic area within which the information must be kept confidential or as a trade secret.Section 6. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0142PN0087 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627